Nevada, session 83, AB73.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 294A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Any communication made or paid for by a
person, organization, candidate, personal campaign committee of
a candidate, committee for political action or committee sponsored
by a political party that is made in support of or opposition to a
candidate, group of candidates or political party, that provides
information about political or social issues with the intent to
influence the outcome of an election or that solicits contributions
for a candidate, group of candidates or political party and includes
any form of synthetic media in the communication must disclose
on the communication in a clear and conspicuous manner:
This (image/video/audio) has been manipulated.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The disclosure required pursuant to subsection 1 must be
provided in accordance with the following requirements:
(a) For a communication made using visual media that is a
video, the disclosure must appear for the entire duration of the
video; and
(b) For a communication made using only audio, the
disclosure must be read in a clearly spoken manner, in a pitch that
can be easily heard by the average listener and in the same
language as the rest of the audio:
(1) At the beginning of the audio;
(2) At the end of the audio; and
(3) If the audio is longer than 2 minutes in length,
interspersed within the audio at intervals of not more than 2
minutes each.
3. Any candidate who is depicted in any communication that
includes synthetic media and which communication fails to
include the disclosure required pursuant to subsection 1 may seek
an injunction or other equitable relief in district court against the
person, candidate, personal campaign committee of a candidate,
committee for political action or committee sponsored by a
political party who made or paid for the communication.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose
liability for a violation of subsection 1 upon:
(a) Any streaming service, interactive computer service
provider, cloud service provider or internet service provider;
(b) A radio broadcasting station, television broadcasting
station, telecommunications network or cable or satellite television
operator;
(c) Any programmer or producer of radio or television
broadcasting content; or
(d) Any person who publishes synthetic media as part of
entertainment as a satire or parody.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based system
that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers from the input it
receives how to generate outputs such as predictions, content,
recommendations or decisions that can influence physical or
virtual environments.
(b) “Generative adversarial network” means a framework for
machine learning that uses adversarial training towards the
development of generative artificial intelligence.
(c) “Generative artificial intelligence” means a technology of
artificial intelligence that is capable of creating content such as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
text, audio, image or video based on patterns learned from large
volumes of data rather than being explicitly programmed with
rules.
(d) “Interactive computer service” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2).
(e) “Synthetic media” means an image, audio recording or
video recording of the appearance, speech or conduct of a person
that has been intentionally manipulated with the use of generative
adversarial network techniques, artificial intelligence or
generative artificial intelligence to create a realistic but false
image, audio recording or video recording that produces:
(1) A depiction that to a reasonable natural person is of a
real natural person in appearance, action or speech but that did
not actually occur in reality or was not authentically captured or
recorded; and
(2) A fundamentally different understanding or impression
of the appearance, action or speech of a person than what a
reasonable natural person would have from viewing or listening to
the unaltered original version of the image, audio recording or
video recording.
Secs. 3-5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)